California statutes. Civil Code
 upon by both the homeowner and the management. A fee may be charged for a rental agreement of more than one year if the fee is mutually agreed upon by both the homeowner and management.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the following shall apply to floating home marinas within the County of Marin:

(1) (A) Fees for utilities and incidental reasonable charges for services actually rendered to a homeowner shall reflect actual costs.

(B) A marina owner shall demonstrate for all fees charged to
 a homeowner that the service was, or is currently being, actually rendered.

(2) A marina owner shall not charge a homeowner a fee for enforcement of a marina’s rules and regulations.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2038, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 498, Sec. 3.   (AB 754)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2038, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

800.41.

(a) A homeowner shall not be charged a fee for other than rent, utilities, and incidental reasonable charges for services actually rendered.

(b) A homeowner shall not be charged a fee for obtaining a rental agreement on a floating home berth for (1) a term of 12 months, or (2) a lesser period as mutually agreed upon by both the homeowner and the management. A fee may be charged for a rental agreement of more than one year if the fee is mutually agreed upon by both the homeowner and management.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2038.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 498, Sec. 4.   (AB 754)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2038, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

800.42.

A homeowner shall not be charged a fee for services actually rendered which are not listed in the rental agreement unless he or she has been given written notice thereof by the management, at least 60 days before imposition of the charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.43.

A homeowner shall not be charged a fee for keeping a pet in the floating home marina unless the management actually provides special facilities or services for pets. If special pet facilities are maintained by the management, the fee charged shall reasonably relate to the cost of maintenance of the facilities or services and the number of pets kept in the floating home marina.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.44.

(a) A homeowner shall not be charged a fee for a guest who does not stay with him or her for more than a total of 20 consecutive days or a total of 30 days in a calendar year. Such a guest shall not be required to register with the management.

(b) A homeowner who is living alone and who wishes to share his or her floating home with one person may do so, and a fee shall not be imposed by management for that person. The person shall be considered a guest of the homeowner and any agreement between the homeowner and the person shall not change the terms and conditions
 of the rental agreement between management and the homeowner. The guest shall comply with the provisions of the rules and regulations of the floating home marina.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.45.

A homeowner shall not be charged a fee based on the number of members in his or her immediate family. As used in this section, the “immediate family” includes the homeowner and his or her spouse, their parents, and their children.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.46.

A homeowner shall not be charged a fee for the enforcement of any of the rules and regulations of the floating home marina.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.47.

Unless the homeowner specifically requests the service in writing from the management, a homeowner shall not be charged a fee for the entry, installation, hookup, or landscaping as a condition of tenancy except for an actual fee or cost imposed by a local governmental ordinance or requirement directly related to the occupancy of the specific berth where the floating home is located and not incurred as a portion of the development of the floating home marina as a whole. However, reasonable landscaping and maintenance requirements may be included in the floating home marina rules and regulations. The management shall not require a homeowner or
 prospective homeowner to purchase, rent, or lease goods or services for landscaping from any person, company, or corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.48.

Where the management provides both master meter and submeter service of utilities to a homeowner, for each billing period the cost of the charges for the period shall be separately stated along with the opening and closing readings for his or her meter. The management shall post in a conspicuous place, the prevailing residential utilities rate schedule as published by the serving utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.49.

(a) The management may only demand a security deposit on or before initial occupancy and the security deposit may not be in an amount or value in excess of an amount equal to two months’ rent that is charged at the inception of the tenancy, in addition to any rent for the first month. In no event shall additional security deposits be demanded of a homeowner following initial occupancy. 

(b) After the homeowner has promptly paid to the management within five days of the date the amount is due, all of the rent, utilities, and reasonable service charges for any
 12-consecutive-month period subsequent to the collection of the security deposit by the management, or upon resale of the floating home, whichever occurs earlier, the management shall, upon the receipt of a written request from the homeowner, refund to the homeowner the amount of the security deposit within 30 days following the end of the 12-consecutive-mon th period of prompt payment or the date of the resale of the floating home. 

(c) In the event that the interest in the floating home marina is transferred to any other party or entity, the successor in interest shall have the same obligations of management contained in this section with respect to the security deposit. 

(d) The management shall not be required to place any security deposit collected in an interest-bearing account or to provide a homeowner with any interest on the security deposit collected. 

(e) This section applies to all security deposits collected on or after January 1, 1991.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 942, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

800.50.

The management shall not acquire a lien or security interest, other than an interest arising by reason of process issued to enforce a judgment of any court, in a floating home located in the floating home marina unless it is mutually agreed upon by both the homeowner and management. Any billing and payment upon the obligation shall be kept separate from current rent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Homeowner Meetings [800.60. - 800.61.]

800.60.

The management shall permit meetings by homeowners or residents of a floating home in the marina, or any or all of them, relating to floating home living or social or educational purposes, including forums for or speeches of public officials or candidates for public office, to be held in any community facility if the meeting is held at reasonable hours and when the facility is not otherwise in use. The management’s private office is not to be considered a community facility unless so designated by the management.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.61.

The management shall meet and consult with the homeowners, upon written request, within 30 days of the request, either individually, collectively, or with representatives of a group of homeowners who have signed a request to be so represented on the following matters:

(a) Amendments to floating home marina rules and regulations.

(b) Standards for maintenance or physical improvements in the floating home marina.

(c) Addition, alteration, or deletion of
 services, equipment or physical improvements.

(d) Rental agreements offered pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 800.20).

Any collective meeting shall be conducted only after notice thereof has been given to all the requesting homeowners 10 days or more before the meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Termination of Tenancy [800.70. - 800.75.]

800.70.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that, because of the high cost of moving floating homes, the potential for damage resulting therefrom, the requirements relating to the installation of floating homes, and current government policy limiting the availability of floating home berths, it is necessary that the owners of floating homes within floating home marinas be provided with the unique protection from actual or constructive eviction afforded by the provisions of this chapter.

(b) The management shall not terminate or refuse to renew a tenancy, except for a
 reason specified in this article and upon the giving of written notice to the homeowner in the manner prescribed by Section 1162 of the Code of Civil Procedure, to remove the floating home from the floating home marina within a period of not less than 60 days, which period shall be specified in the notice. A copy of this notice shall be sent to the legal owner, as defined in Section 18005.8 of the Health and Safety Code, each junior lienholder, as defined in Section 18005.3 of the Health and Safety Code, and the registered owner of the floating home, if other than the homeowner, by United States mail within 10 days after notice to the homeowner, addressed to the legal owner, each junior lienholder, and the registered owner at their addresses, as set forth in the registration card specified in Section 18091.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.71.

A tenancy shall be terminated by the management only for one or more of the following reasons:

(a) Failure of the homeowner or resident to comply with a local ordinance or state law or regulation relating to floating homes within a reasonable time after the homeowner receives a notice of noncompliance from the appropriate governmental agency.

(b) Conduct by the homeowner or resident, upon the floating home marina premises, which constitutes a substantial annoyance to other homeowners or residents. 

(c) Failure of the homeowner or resident to comply with a reasonable rule or regulation of the floating home marina as set forth in the rental agreement or any amendment thereto. The management may not impose unreasonable restrictions on the right of the homeowner to sublet his or her floating home.

No act or omission of the homeowner or resident shall constitute a failure to comply with a reasonable rule or regulation unless and until the management has given the homeowner written notice of the alleged rule or regulation violation and the homeowner or resident has failed to adhere to the rule or regulation within seven days. However, if a homeowner has been given a written notice of an alleged violation of the same rule or regulation on three or more occasions within a 12-month period after the homeowner or resident has violated that rule or regulation, no written notice shall be required for a
 subsequent violation of the same rule or regulation.

Nothing in this subdivision shall relieve the management from its obligation to demonstrate that a rule or regulation has in fact been violated.

(d) (1) Nonpayment of rent, utility charges, or reasonable incidental service charges; if the amount due has been unpaid for a period of at least five days from its due date, and provided, that the homeowner shall be given a three-day written notice subsequent to that five-day period to pay the amount due or to vacate the tenancy. The three-day written notice shall be given to the homeowner in the manner prescribed by Section 1162 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The notice may be given at the same time as the 60 days’ notice required for termination of the tenancy.

Payment by the homeowner prior to the expiration of the three-day notice period
 shall cure a default under this subdivision.

(2) However, if a homeowner has been given a three-day notice to pay the amount due or to vacate the tenancy on three or more occasions within the preceding 12-month period, no written three-day notice shall be required for a subsequent nonpayment of rent, utility charges, or reasonable incidental service charges.

(3) Payment by the legal owner, any junior lienholder, or the registered owner, if other than the homeowner, on behalf of the homeowner prior to the expiration of 30 calendar days following the mailing of the notice to the legal owner, each junior lienholder, and the registered owner provided in subdivision (b) of Section 800.70, shall cure a default under this subdivision with respect to that payment.

(4) The homeowner shall remain liable for all payments due up
 until the time the tenancy is vacated.

(5) Cure of a default of rent, utility charges, or reasonable incidental service charges by the legal owner, any junior lienholder, or the registered owner, if other than the homeowner, as provided by this subdivision, may not be exercised more than twice during a 12-month period.

(e) Condemnation of the floating home marina.

(f) Change of use of the floating home marina or any portion thereof, provided:

(1) The management gives the homeowners at least 60 days’ written notice that the management will be appearing before a local governmental board, commission, or body to request permits for a change of use of the floating home marina.

(2) After all
 required permits requesting a change of use have been approved by the local governmental board, commission, or body, the management shall give the homeowners six months’ or more written notice of termination of tenancy.

If the change of use requires no local governmental permits, then notice shall be given 12 months or more prior to the management’s determination that a change of use will occur. The management in the notice shall disclose and describe in detail the nature of the change of use.

(3) The management gives each proposed homeowner written notice thereof prior to the inception of his or her tenancy that the management is requesting a change of use before local governmental bodies or that a change of use request has been granted.

(4) The notice requirements for termination of tenancy set forth in this section and Section 800.72
 shall be followed if the proposed change actually occurs. 

(5) The requirements for a notice of a proposed change of use imposed by this subdivision shall be governed by the law in effect at the time the notice was given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.72.

The management shall set forth in a notice of termination the reason relied upon for the termination with specific facts to permit determination of the date, place, witnesses, and circumstances concerning that reason. Neither reference to the section number or a subdivision thereof nor a recital of the language of this article constitutes compliance with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.73.

No tenancy shall be terminated for the purpose of making a homeowner’s berth available for a person who purchases a floating home from the owner of the floating home marina or his or her agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.74.

A homeowner shall give written notice to the management of not less than 60 days before vacating his or her tenancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.75.

The provisions of this article shall not affect any rights or proceedings set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1159) of Title 3 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure except as otherwise provided in those sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Transfer of a Floating Home [800.80. - 800.91.]

800.80.

A homeowner or his or her agent may advertise the sale or exchange of his or her floating home, or, if not prohibited by the terms of an agreement with the management, may advertise the rental of his or her floating home, by displaying a sign in the window of the floating home, or by a sign posted on the side of the floating home facing the dock or water or both, stating that the floating home is for sale or exchange or, if not prohibited, for rent by the owner of the floating home or his or her agent. The sign shall state the name, address, and telephone number of the owner of the floating home or his or her agent and may be at least 24 inches in
 width and 18 inches in height.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.82.

(a) The management shall not show or list for sale a floating home without first obtaining the owner’s written authorization. The authorization shall specify the terms and conditions regarding the showing or listing.

(b) The management shall prohibit neither the listing nor the sale of a floating home within the floating home marina by the homeowner, or an agent of the homeowner to authorize the management to act as the agent in the sale of a floating home as a condition of management’s approval of buyer or prospective homeowner for residency in the floating home
 marina.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.83.

(a) The management shall not charge a homeowner, or his or her agent a transfer or selling fee as a condition of a sale of his or her floating home within a floating home marina unless the management performs a service in the sale. The management shall not perform any such service in connection with the sale unless so requested in writing, by the homeowner or his or her agent.

(b) The management shall not charge a prospective homeowner or his or her agent, upon purchase of a floating home, a fee as a condition of approval for residency in a floating home marina
 unless the management performs a specific service in the sale. The management shall not impose a fee, other than for a credit check in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 800.85, for an interview of a prospective homeowner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.84.

The management shall not require the removal of a floating home from the floating home marina in the event of its sale to a third party during the term of the homeowner’s rental agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.85.

(a) The management may require the right of prior approval of a purchaser of a floating home that will remain in the floating home marina and that the selling homeowner or his or her agent give notice of the sale to the management before the close of the sale. Approval cannot be withheld if the purchaser has the financial ability to pay the rent and charges of the floating home marina unless the management reasonably determines that, based on the purchaser’s prior tenancies, he or she will not comply with the rules and regulations of the floating home marina. In determining whether the purchaser has the financial ability to pay
 the rent and charges of the floating home marina, the management shall not require the purchaser to submit copies of any personal income tax returns in order to obtain approval for residency in the floating home marina. However, management may require the purchaser to document the amount and source of his or her gross monthly income or means of financial support. If the ownership or management rejects a purchaser as a prospective homeowner, the ownership or management shall inform the selling homeowner in writing of its reasons for the rejection. If the approval of a purchaser is withheld for any reason other than those stated in this article, the management or owner may be held liable for all damages proximately resulting therefrom.

(b) If the management collects a fee or charge from a prospective purchaser of a floating home in order to obtain a financial report or credit rating, the full amount of the fee or charge shall be credited toward
 payment of the first month’s rent for that floating home purchaser. If, for whatever reason, the prospective purchaser is rejected by the management, the management shall refund to the prospective purchaser the full amount of that fee or charge within 30 days from the date of rejection. If the prospective purchaser is approved by the management, but, for whatever reason, the prospective purchaser elects not to purchase the floating home, the management may retain the fee, or a portion thereof, to defray its administrative costs under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.86.

(a) An escrow, sale, or transfer agreement involving a floating home located in the floating home marina at the time of sale, where the floating home is to remain in the floating home marina, shall contain a provision signed by the purchaser stating that by his or her signature he or she has agreed to the terms of a rental agreement. A copy of a fully executed rental agreement signed by both the purchaser and floating home marina management will satisfy the requirements of this section.

(b) In the event the purchaser fails to execute the rental agreement, the
 purchaser shall not have any rights of tenancy.

(c) In the event that an occupant of a floating home has no rights of tenancy and is not otherwise entitled to occupy the floating home pursuant to this chapter, the occupant shall be considered an unlawful occupant if, after a demand is made for the surrender of the floating home marina berth, for a period of five days, the occupant has refused to surrender the berth to the floating home marina management. In the event the unlawful occupant fails to comply with the demand, the unlawful occupant shall be subject to the proceedings set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1159) of Title 3 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) The occupant of the floating home shall not be considered an unlawful occupant and shall not be subject to the provisions of subdivision (c) if all of the following conditions exist:

(1) The occupant is the registered owner of the floating home.

(2) The management has determined that the occupant has the financial ability to pay the rent and charges of the floating home marina, will comply with the rules and regulations of the floating home marina, based on the occupant’s prior tenancies, and will comply with this article.

(3) The management failed or refused to offer the occupant a rental agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.87.

No rental or sale agreement shall contain a provision by which the purchaser or homeowner waives his or her rights under this article. Any waiver thereof shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.88.

An heir or joint tenant who gains ownership of a floating home in the floating home marina through the death of the owner of the floating home who is a homeowner shall have the right to sell the floating home to a third party in accordance with this article, but only if all the homeowner’s responsibilities and liabilities to the management regarding rent, utilities, and reasonable maintenance of the floating home and its premises which have arisen after the transfer of ownership to the heir or joint tenant have been satisfied up until the date the floating home is resold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 942, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

800.89.

Any legal owner or junior lienholder who forecloses on his or her security interest in a floating home located in a floating home marina shall have the right to sell the floating home within the floating home marina to a third party in accordance with the provisions of this article, but only if all the homeowner’s responsibilities and liabilities to the management regarding rent, utilities, and reasonable maintenance of a floating home and it’s premises are satisfied by the foreclosing creditor through the date the floating home is resold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.90.

The management (1) shall not prohibit the listing or sale of a used floating home within the floating home marina by the homeowner, or an agent of the homeowner other than the management, (2) nor require the selling homeowner to authorize the management to act as the agent in the sale of a floating home as a condition of approval of the buyer or prospective homeowner for residency in the floating home marina.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.91.

(a) No action based upon the management’s alleged failure to maintain the physical improvements in the common facilities in good working order or condition or alleged reduction of service may be commenced by a homeowner unless the management has been given at least 30 days’ prior notice of the intention to commence the action.

(b) The notice shall be in writing, signed by the homeowner or homeowners making the allegations, and shall notify the management of the basis of the claim, the specific allegations, and the remedies requested. A notice by one homeowner shall
 be deemed to be sufficient notice of the specific allegation to the management of the floating home marina by all of the homeowners in the floating home marina.

(c) The notice may be served in the manner prescribed in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1010) of Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) For purposes of this section, management shall be deemed to be notified of an alleged failure to maintain the physical improvements in the common facilities in good working order or condition or of an alleged reduction of services upon substantial compliance by the homeowner or homeowners with the provisions of subdivisions (b) and (c), or when management has been notified of the alleged failure to maintain or the alleged reduction of services by a state or local agency.

(e) If the notice is served within
 30 days of the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations, the time for the commencement of the action shall be extended 30 days from the service of the notice.

(f) This section does not apply to actions for personal injury or wrongful death.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Transfer of a Floating Home Marina [800.100. - 800.100.]

800.100.

(a) When the owner of a floating home marina enters into a written listing agreement with a licensed real estate broker, as defined in Article 1 (commencing with Section 10130) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, for the sale of the marina or offers to sell the marina to any party, the owner shall provide written notice by first-class mail or by personal delivery to the president, secretary, and treasurer of the resident organization, not less than 30 days but no more than one year prior to
 entering into any written listing agreement for the sale of the marina, or making any offer to sell the marina to any party. An offer to sell a marina shall not be construed as an offer under this subdivision unless it is initiated by the marina owner or his or her agent.

(b) An owner of a floating home marina is not required to comply with subdivision (a) unless the following conditions are met:

(1) The resident organization has first furnished the marina owner or marina manager a written notice of the name and address of the president, secretary, and treasurer of the resident organization to whom the notice of sale shall be given.

(2) The resident organization has first notified the marina owner or manager in writing that the marina residents are interested in purchasing the marina. The initial notice by the
 resident organization shall be made prior to a written listing or offer to sell the marina by the marina owner, and the resident organization shall give subsequent notice once each year thereafter that the marina residents are interested in purchasing the marina.

(3) The resident organization has furnished the marina owner or marina manager a written notice, within five days, of any change in the name or address of the officers of the resident organization to whom the notice of sale shall be given.

(c) Nothing in this section affects the validity of title to real property transferred in violation of this section, although a violation shall subject the seller to civil action pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 800.200) by homeowner residents of the marina or by the resident organization.

(d) Nothing in this
 section affects the ability of a licensed real estate broker to collect a commission pursuant to an executed contract between the broker and the floating home marina owner.

(e) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Any sale or other transfer by a marina owner who is a natural person to any relation specified in Section 6401 or 6402 of the Probate Code.

(2) Any transfer by gift, devise, or operation of law.

(3) Any transfer by a corporation to an affiliate. As used in this paragraph, “affiliate” means any shareholder of the transferring corporation, any corporation or entity owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by the transferring corporation, or any other corporation or entity controlled, directly or indirectly, by any
 shareholder of the transferring corporation.

(4) Any transfer by a partnership to any of its partners.

(5) Any conveyance resulting from the judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure of a mortgage or deed of trust encumbering a floating home marina or any deed given in lieu of such a foreclosure.

(6) Any sale or transfer between or among joint tenants or tenants in common owning a floating home marina.

(7) The purchase of a floating home marina by a governmental entity under its powers of eminent domain.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Actions, Proceedings, and Penalties [800.200. - 800.201.]

800.200.

In any action arising out of the provisions of this chapter the prevailing party shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. A party shall be deemed a prevailing party for the purposes of this section if the judgment is rendered in his or her favor or where the litigation is dismissed in his or her favor prior to or during the trial, unless the parties otherwise agree in the settlement or compromise.

In the event a homeowner or former homeowner of a floating home marina is the prevailing party in a civil action against the management to enforce his or her rights under the provisions of this
 chapter, the homeowner, in addition to damages afforded by law, may, in the discretion of the court, be awarded an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each willful violation of those provisions by the management.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.201.

(a) The substantial failure of the management to provide and maintain physical improvements in the common facilities in good working order and condition shall be deemed a public nuisance. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 3491, such a nuisance only may be remedied by a civil action or abatement.

(b) The substantial violation of a floating home marina rule shall be deemed a public nuisance. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 3491, such a nuisance only may be remedied by a civil action or abatement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Cooperatives and Condominiums [800.300. - 800.306.]

800.300.

As used in this article:

(a) “Ownership or management” means the ownership or management of a cooperative or condominium for floating homes.

(b) “Resident” means a person who maintains a residence in a cooperative or condominium for floating homes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.301.

A resident may advertise the sale or exchange of his or her floating home or, if not prohibited by the terms of an agreement with the management or ownership, may advertise the rental of his or her floating home by displaying a sign in the window of his or her floating home stating that the floating home is for sale or exchange or, if not prohibited, for rent by the owner of the floating home or his or her agent. The sign shall state the name, address, and telephone number of the owner of the floating home or his or her agent, and shall be 24 inches in width and 18 inches in length.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 942, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

800.302.

The ownership or management shall not show or list for sale a floating home owned by a resident without first obtaining the resident’s written authorization. The authorization shall specify the terms and conditions regarding the showing or listing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 942, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

800.303.

The ownership or management shall not require the removal of a floating home from a cooperative or condominium in the event of its sale to a third party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.304.

The ownership or management may require the right to prior approval of the purchaser of a floating home that will remain in the cooperative or condominium for floating homes and that the selling resident or his or her agent give notice of the sale to the ownership or management before the close of the sale. Approval cannot be withheld if the purchaser has the financial ability to pay the fees and charges of the cooperative or condominium unless the ownership or management reasonably determines that, based on the purchaser’s prior residences, he or she will not comply with the rules and regulations of the cooperative or
 condominium.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.305.

No agreement shall contain any provision by which the purchaser waives his or her rights under this article. Any waiver thereof shall be deemed contrary to public policy and void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.306.

This chapter applies only to the relationship between the management and the homeowners and residents of floating home marinas. Nothing in this chapter affects residential use of tide and submerged lands, including the public trust doctrine or any legislative grant of tide and submerged lands to a public entity, or the administration of these lands by the State Lands Commission or a legislative grantee. In addition, this chapter does not supplant, lessen, modify, or otherwise affect past or future regulation of floating homes or floating home marinas by the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission pursuant to the McAteer-Petris
 Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Servitudes [801. - 813.]

801.

The following land burdens, or servitudes upon land, may be attached to other land as incidents or appurtenances, and are then called easements:

1. The right of pasture;

2. The right of fishing;

3. The right of taking game;

4. The right-of-way;

5. The right of taking water, wood, minerals, and other things;

6. The right of transacting business upon land;

7. The right of conducting lawful sports upon land;

8. The right of receiving air, light, or heat from or over, or discharging the same upon or over land;

9. The right of receiving water from or discharging the same upon land;

10. The right of flooding land;

11. The right of having water flow without diminution or disturbance of any kind;

12. The right of using a wall as a party wall;

13. The right of receiving more than natural support from adjacent land
or things affixed thereto;

14. The right of having the whole of a division fence maintained by a coterminous owner;

15. The right of having public conveyances stopped, or of stopping the same on land;

16. The right of a seat in church;

17. The right of burial;

18. The right of receiving sunlight upon or over land as specified in Section 801.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1154.)
-------------------------------------------

801.5.

(a) The right of receiving sunlight as specified in subdivision 18 of Section 801 shall be referred to as a solar easement. “Solar easement” means the right of receiving sunlight across real property of another for any solar energy system.

As used in this section, “solar energy system” means either of the following that is designed to serve
 one utility retail customer on the same property, more than one utility retail customer on the same property, one utility retail customer on the same, adjacent, or contiguous properties, or more than one utility retail customer on the same, adjacent or contiguous properties, and is not designed for procurement of electricity by an electric utility:

(1) Any solar collector or other solar energy device whose primary purpose is to provide for the collection, storage, and distribution of solar energy for space heating, space cooling, electric generation, or water heating.

(2) A structural design feature, including the following:

(A) Solar racking, solar mounting, and elevated solar support structures, including, but not
 limited to, solar carports, solar shade structures, solar awnings, solar canopies, and solar patio covers, regardless of whether the feature is on the ground or on a building. Elevated solar support structures include the aboveground superstructure and associated foundation elements that support the solar collectors or other solar energy devices described in paragraph (1). 

(B) Any design feature whose primary purpose is to provide for the collection, storage, and distribution of solar energy for electricity generation, space heating or cooling, or for water heating.
